Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-1457
Manufacturer-dealer agreement; renewal; restrictions.

A manufacturer-dealer agreement that has been renewed shall not require additional inventory stocking requirements or increased retail sales targets in excess of the market growth in the dealer's area of sales responsibility.

Laws 2026, LB972, § 16.
October 1, 2026